Hawaii statutes.
§664-5 No patent on award until boundaries
settled. The department of land and natural resources is forbidden to
issue any patent in confirmation of an award by name, made by the commissioners
to quiet land titles, without the boundaries being defined in such patent,
according to the decision of a commissioner of boundaries, or the intermediate
appellate court, or the supreme court on appeal. [L 1894-5, c 14, §7; RL 1925,
§556; RL 1935, §3664; RL 1945, §10205; RL 1955, §234-5; am L Sp 1959 2d, c 1,
§21; am L 1961, c 132, §1; HRS §664-5; am L 2004, c 202, §73; am L 2006, c 94,
§1; am L 2010, c 109, §1]

Cross References

See Appendix to Revised Laws of Hawaii 1925, pp 2120-2152.

Case Notes

Awards by metes and bounds. 30 H. 666. Decree. 31 H. 118.

Cited: 49 H. 456, 486-7, 421 P.2d 550.

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next